zh-CN: 遮阳篷设计: 弯曲的; 扁平的; 其他
zh-TW: 遮陽篷設計: 弧形; 平坦; 其他
ru: Тип маркизы: Изогнутый; Плоский; Другой
nb: Markisedesign: Buet; Flat; Annet
ja: 日除けのデザイン: カーブド; フラット; その他
fr: Conception d’auvent: Incurvée; Plate; Autre
sk-SK: Dizajn markízy: Zakrivený; Plochý; Iné
pt-BR: Projeto de toldo: Curvada; Plana; Outro
hu: Napellenző kialakítása: Íves; Lapos; Egyéb
fi: Markiisin muotoilu: Kaareva; Tasainen; Muu
hr-HR: Dizajn tende: Zakrivljena; Ravna; Ostalo
pt-PT: Projeto de toldo: Curvado; Plano; Outro
el: Σχέδιο τέντας: Καμπυλωτή; Επίπεδη; Άλλο
it: Progettazione di tende da sole: Curvo; Piatto; Altro
bg-BG: Дизайн на тента: Извит; Плосък; Други
vi: Thiết kế mái hiên: Cong; Phẳng; Khác
es: Diseño de toldo: Curva; Puro; Otros
sl-SI: Zasnova tende: Ukrivljeno; Ravno; Drugo
nl: Luifel ontwerp: Gebogen; Vlak; Andere
th: การออกแบบกันสาด: โค้ง; ราบ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Design copertină: Curbată; Plată; Altele
tr: Tente tasarımı: Kavisli; Düz; Diğer
lt-LT: Markizės konstrukcija: Lenktas; Plokščias; Kita
cs: Design markýzy: Zaoblený; Plochý; Jiné
de: Markisendesign: Gebogen; Flach; Sonstiges
en: Awning design: Curved; Flat; Other
pl: Konstrukcja markizy: Zakrzywiony; Płaski; Inne
ko: 어닝 디자인: 곡선형; 플랫; 기타
sv: Design på markis: Böjd; Platt; Övrigt
da: Markisedesign: Buet; Flad; Andet